California, session 20252026, AB2771.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 94801.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:94801.5. (a) An out-of-state private postsecondary educational institution shall register with the bureau, pay a fee pursuant to Section 94930.5, and comply with all of the following:(1) The institution shall provide the bureau with all of the following information, as applicable, for consideration of initial registration by the bureau pursuant to paragraph (2).(A) Evidence of institutional accreditation.(B) Evidence that the institution is approved to operate in the state where the institution maintains its main administrative location.(C) The agent for service of process consistent with Section 94943.5.(D) A copy of the institution’s catalog and, if the institution uses enrollment agreements, a copy of a sample enrollment agreement.(E) Whether or not the institution, or a predecessor institution under substantially the same control or ownership, had its authorization or approval revoked or suspended by a state or by the federal government, or, within five years before submission of the registration, was subject to an enforcement action by a state or by the federal government that resulted in the imposition of limits on enrollment or student aid, or is subject to such an action that is not final and that was ongoing at the time of submission of the registration.(F) Whether or not the institution, or a controlling officer of, or a controlling interest or controlling investor in, the institution or in the parent entity of the institution, had been subject to any education, consumer protection, unfair business practice, fraud, or related enforcement action by a state or federal agency within five years before submitting the registration. If so, the institution shall provide the bureau a copy of the operative complaint with the registration.(G) Whether or not the institution is currently on probation, show cause, or subject to other adverse action, or the equivalent thereof, by its accreditor or has had its accreditation revoked or suspended within the five years before submitting the registration.(H) Whether or not the institution, within five years before submitting the registration, has settled, or been adjudged to have liability for, a civil complaint alleging the institution’s failure to provide educational services, including a complaint alleging a violation of Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 (Public Law 92-318) or a similar state law, or a complaint alleging a violation of a law concerning consumer protection, unfair business practice, or fraud, filed by a student or former student, an employee or former employee, or a public official, for more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). The institution shall provide the bureau a copy of the complaint filed by the plaintiff and a copy of the judgment or settlement agreement for any such judgment or settlement, and the bureau shall consider, pursuant to paragraph (2), all material terms and aspects of the settlement, including, for example, whether a student plaintiff remained enrolled or reenrolled at the institution.(I) Any additional documentation the bureau deems necessary for consideration in the registration process.(2) When considering whether to approve, deny, or condition initial registration based upon the information provided by an institution pursuant to paragraph (1), the bureau shall do all of the following:(A) Not consider any individual submission made under paragraph (1) to be solely determinative of the institution’s eligibility for registration but, exercising its reasonable discretion, approve, reject, or condition registration based upon a review of all of the information provided to it under paragraph (1).(B) Provide an institution with reasonable notice and opportunity to comment before the bureau regarding any determination to deny, condition, or reject initial registration before that determination becomes final. After the determination becomes final, the institution may seek review of the bureau’s decision through an action brought pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure.(C) Require the initial registration, if approved, to memorialize that the institution agrees, as a condition of its registration, to be bound by this section and that its registration may be rejected, conditioned, or revoked for failure to comply with this section, as provided by subdivision (b). The agreement shall be signed by a responsible officer of the institution.(3) An institution that is registered with the bureau and enrolls a student residing in California shall report in writing to the bureau, within 30 days, the occurrence of any of the following:(A) The institution has its authorization or approval revoked or suspended by a state or by the federal government, or has been subject to an enforcement action by a state or by the federal government that resulted in the imposition of limits on enrollment or student aid.(B) The institution or a controlling officer of, or a controlling interest or controlling investor in, the institution or in the parent entity of the institution is subject to any education, consumer protection, unfair business practice, fraud, or related enforcement action by a state or federal agency. If so, the institution shall provide the bureau a copy of the operative complaint.(C) The institution is currently on probation, show cause, or subject to other adverse action, or the equivalent thereof, by its accreditor or the accreditation of the institution is revoked or suspended.(D) The institution settles, or is adjudged to have liability for, a civil complaint alleging the institution’s failure to provide educational services, including a complaint alleging a violation of Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 (Public Law 92-318) or a similar state law, or a complaint alleging a violation of a law concerning consumer protection, unfair business practice, or fraud, filed by a student or former student, an employee or former employee, or a public official, for more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). The institution shall provide to the bureau a copy of the complaint filed by the plaintiff and a copy of the judgment or settlement agreement for any such judgment or settlement, and the bureau shall consider, pursuant to subdivision (b), all material terms and aspects of the settlement, including, for example, whether a student plaintiff remained enrolled or reenrolled at the institution.(4) The requirements of the Student Tuition Recovery Fund, established in Article 14 (commencing with Section 94923), and regulations adopted by the bureau related to the fund, for its students residing in California.(5) The institution shall provide disclosures pursuant to the requirements for the Student Tuition Recovery Fund, established in Article 14 (commencing with Section 94923), and regulations adopted by the bureau related to the fund, for its students residing in California.(b) (1) Upon receipt of any of the notifications in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), or in response to a complaint submitted pursuant to subdivision (g), the bureau may request from the institution, and the institution shall provide, information necessary to determine whether the institution’s registration should be revoked or have conditions placed upon it.(2) Any institution under review pursuant to paragraph (1) may have its registration revoked by the bureau if, after further review, the bureau issues a written finding that there is a substantial risk posed to California residents by the institution continuing to enroll California residents.(3) An institution shall have the right to reasonable notice and opportunity to comment to and before the bureau regarding any determination to revoke registration or to limit enrollment before that determination becomes final. An institution may seek review of a bureau order limiting new student enrollment or revoking registration under this subdivision through an action brought pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure.(4) This subdivision shall not be construed as preventing the bureau from revoking an institution’s registration on any other grounds specified in this chapter. This section shall not be construed as prohibiting or impairing the ability of an institution registered pursuant to this section or eligible to register pursuant to this section from applying to be an approved institution pursuant to this chapter.(c) (1) This section does not apply to a higher education institution that grants undergraduate degrees, graduate degrees, or both, and that is either formed as a nonprofit corporation and is accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, or is a public institution of higher education.(2) This section does not apply to a higher education institution that does not award degrees and that solely provides educational programs for total charges of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less when no part of the total charges is paid from state or federal student financial aid programs. The bureau may adjust this charge threshold based upon the California Consumer Price Index and post notification of the adjusted charge threshold on its internet website as the bureau determines, through the promulgation of regulations, that the adjustment is consistent with the intent of this chapter.(d) An institution described in subdivision (a) that fails to comply with this section is not authorized to operate in this state. Any institution whose registration is denied or revoked is authorized to reapply for registration after 12 months have elapsed from the date of the denial or revocation of registration.(e) A registration with the bureau pursuant to this section shall be valid for five years.(f) The bureau shall develop through emergency regulations effective on and after July 1, 2021, a registration form. The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code. These emergency regulations shall become law through the regular rulemaking process by January 1, 2022.(g) The bureau shall disclose on its internet website a list of institutions registered pursuant to this section through reasonable means and disclose a designated email address for California residents to send a complaint to the bureau about an institution registered pursuant to this section. Complaints received through this email address shall be investigated in the same manner as complaints received by the bureau for institutions approved to operate pursuant to this chapter, but bureau enforcement in response to such complaints against institutions registered pursuant to this section shall be governed by subdivision (b).SEC. 2. Section 94874 of the Education Code is amended to read:94874. Except as provided in Sections 94874.2, 94874.7, and 94927.5, the following are exempt from this chapter:(a) An institution that offers solely avocational or recreational educational programs.(b) (1) An institution only offering nondegree educational programs to members of a bona fide trade, business, professional, or fraternal organization that is separate and distinct from the institution and that sponsors the educational programs. An institution that sponsors an educational program directly or through an affiliated division or corporate entity of the institution and that requires student membership for purposes of those educational programs does not qualify under this exemption.(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a bona fide organization, association, or council that offers preapprenticeship training programs, on behalf of one or more Division of Apprenticeship Standards-approved labor-management apprenticeship programs that satisfies one of the following conditions:(i) It is not on the Eligible Training Provider List established and maintained by the California Workforce Development Board but has met the requirements for placement on the list.(ii) It is on the Eligible Training Provider List established and maintained by the California Workforce Development Board and meets the requirements for continued listing.(B) If an organization, association, or council has been removed from the Eligible Training Provider List established and maintained by the California Workforce Development Board for failure to meet performance standards, it is not exempt until it meets all applicable performance standards.(c) A postsecondary educational institution established, operated, and governed by the federal government or by this state or its political subdivisions.(d) An institution offering either of the following:(1) Test preparation for examinations required for admission to a postsecondary educational institution.(2) Continuing education or license examination preparation, if the institution or the program is approved, certified, or sponsored by any of the following:(A) A government agency, other than the bureau, that licenses persons in a particular profession, occupation, trade, or career field.(B) A state-recognized professional licensing body, such as the State Bar of California, that licenses persons in a particular profession, occupation, trade, or career field.(C) A bona fide trade, business, or professional organization.(e) (1) An institution owned, controlled, and operated and maintained by a religious organization lawfully operating as a nonprofit religious corporation pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, that meets all of the following requirements:(A) The instruction is limited to the principles of that religious organization, or to courses offered pursuant to Section 2789 of the Business and Professions Code. Adding religious perspectives or verbiage to the titles or descriptions of otherwise secular programming or career preparation does not limit instruction to the principles of that religious organization.(B) The diploma or degree is limited to evidence of completion of that education.(2) An institution operating under this subdivision shall offer degrees and diplomas only in the beliefs and practices of the church, religious denomination, or religious organization.(3) An institution operating under this subdivision shall not award degrees in any area of physical science.(4) Any degree or diploma granted under this subdivision shall contain on its face, in the written description of the title of the degree being conferred, a reference to the theological or religious aspect of the degree’s subject area.(5) A degree awarded under this subdivision shall reflect the nature of the degree title, such as “associate of religious studies,” “bachelor of religious studies,” “master of divinity,” or “doctor of divinity.”(f) (1) An institution that does not award degrees and that solely provides or offers to the public educational programs for total charges of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less, unless the institution receives funds through state or federal programs for postsecondary education or training or participates in those programs. The bureau may adjust this cost threshold based upon the California Consumer Price Index and post notification of the adjusted cost threshold on its internet website as the bureau determines, through the promulgation of regulations, that the adjustment is consistent with the intent of this chapter.(2) The exemption described in paragraph (1) shall not apply to institutions that provide any training or curriculum for Class A, B, or C commercial driving licenses, except for employer-administered commercial driving license education programs for entities employing 250 or more commercial driving license drivers in the state.(g) A law school that is accredited by the Council of the Section of Legal Education and Admissions to the Bar of the American Bar Association or a law school or law study program that is subject to the approval, regulation, and oversight of the Committee of Bar Examiners, pursuant to Sections 6046.7 and 6060.7 of the Business and Professions Code.(h) A nonprofit public benefit corporation that satisfies all of the following criteria:(1) Is qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code.(2) Is organized specifically to provide workforce development or rehabilitation services.(3) Is accredited by an accrediting organization for workforce development or rehabilitation services recognized by the Department of Rehabilitation.(i) An institution that is accredited by the Accrediting Commission for Senior Colleges and Universities, Western Association of Schools and Colleges, or the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges, Western Association of Schools and Colleges.(j) Flight instruction providers or programs that provide flight instruction pursuant to Part 141 (commencing with Section 141.1) of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations and meet both of the following criteria: Regulations.(1)The flight instruction provider or program does not require students to enter into written or oral contracts of indebtedness.(2)The flight instruction provider or program does not require or accept prepayment of instruction-related costs in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).(k) (1) An institution owned, controlled, operated, and maintained by a community-based organization, as defined in Section 7801 of Title 20 of the United States Code, as that section exists on March 1, 2017, that satisfies all of the following criteria:(A) The institution has programs on or is applying for some or all of their programs to be on the Eligible Training Provider List established and maintained by the California Workforce Development Board.(B) The institution is registered as a nonprofit entity qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.(C) The institution does not offer degrees, as defined in Section 94830.(D) The institution does not offer educational programs designed to lead directly or specifically to positions in a profession, occupation, trade, or career field requiring licensure, if bureau approval is required for the student to be eligible to sit for licensure.(E) The institution would not otherwise be subject to oversight of the bureau under this chapter if it did not receive funding under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.). For purposes of this requirement, funds received through the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.) do not count towards the total referenced in subdivision (f) or any other fee charge limitation condition for an exemption from this chapter.(F) The institution can provide a letter from the local workforce development board that demonstrates the institution has met the initial criteria of that board.(2) An institution granted an exemption pursuant to paragraph (1) shall comply with all of the following requirements:(A) The institution shall provide to the Employment Development Department all required tracking information and data necessary to comply with performance reporting requirements under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, codified in Chapter 32 (commencing with Section 3101) of Title 29 of the United States Code, for programs on the Eligible Training Provider List.(B) The institution shall comply with the Eligible Training Provider List policy developed by the California Workforce Development Board.(C) The institution shall not charge a student who is a recipient of funding under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.) any institutional charges, as defined in Section 94844, for attending and participating in the program.SEC. 3. Section 94874.7 of the Education Code is amended to read:94874.7. (a) The bureau shall establish, by regulation, a process pursuant to which an institution that is exempt from this chapter may request from the bureau verification that the institution is exempt. The verification shall be valid for a period of up to two years, as long as the institution maintains full compliance with the requirements of the exemption. In response to a request for verification, the bureau may approve the request, deny the request, or determine that it is unable to verify the exemption.(b) The bureau shall not grant a verification of exemption to an institution under either of the following conditions:(1) The institution previously held an approval to operate and has an outstanding citation or fine, or is under discipline.(2) The institution offers one or more programs designed to lead to licensure that do not hold approval from the pertinent licensing body or bodies.(c) A bureau determination pertaining to a verification of exemption is not an adverse administrative action and is not subject to appeal.(d) A verification of exemption is not required to operate as an exempt institution.(e) The bureau shall establish a reasonable fee to reimburse the bureau’s costs associated with the implementation of this section.SEC. 4. Section 94885 of the Education Code is amended to read:94885. (a) The bureau shall adopt by regulation minimum operating standards for an institution that shall reasonably ensure that all of the following occur:(1) The content of each educational program can achieve its stated objective.(2) The institution maintains specific written standards for student admissions for each educational program and those standards are related to the particular educational program.(3) The facilities, instructional equipment, and materials are sufficient to enable students to achieve the educational program’s goals.(4) The institution maintains a withdrawal policy and provides refunds.(5) The directors, administrators, and faculty are properly qualified.(6) The institution is financially sound and capable of fulfilling its commitments to students.(7) That, upon satisfactory completion of an educational program, the institution gives students a document signifying the degree or diploma awarded.(8) Adequate records and standard transcripts are maintained and are available to students.(9) The institution is maintained and operated in compliance with this chapter and all other applicable ordinances and laws.(b) An institution offering a degree must satisfy one of the following requirements:(1) Accreditation by one or more accrediting agencies recognized by the United States Department of Education, with the scope of that accreditation covering the offering of all degree programs offered by the institution.(2) An accreditation plan, approved by the bureau, for the institution to become fully accredited within five years of the bureau’s issuance of a provisional approval to operate to the institution’s degree programs. The provisional approval for the unaccredited institution to operate degree programs shall be in compliance with Section 94885.5.(c) For institutions that are approved by means of accreditation and accredited by an agency that loses recognition by the United States Department of Education, an application for approval to operate an institution unaccredited shall be submitted to the bureau within six months of the agency’s loss of recognition. The application shall include an accreditation plan for the institution to become fully accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education within five years of the bureau’s issuance to the institution of a provisional approval to operate degree programs. If the institution fails to submit the required application and accreditation plan within six months of its accreditor’s loss of recognition, the institution shall cease to hold a valid approval to operate. The bureau shall review the submitted application and accreditation plan and issue the institution a provisional approval to operate degree programs within 18 months of the accreditor’s loss of recognition or deny the application, at which time the institution shall cease to hold a valid approval to operate. An unaccredited institution with a provisional approval to operate degree programs shall comply with Section 94885.5, except for paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 94885.5. The institution shall not seek bureau approval for additional degree programs until the institution regains accreditation.SEC. 5. Section 94885.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:94885.5. (a) If an institution that has not been accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education seeks to offer one or more degree programs, the institution shall satisfy the following requirements in order to be issued a provisional approval to operate degree programs from the bureau:(1) (A) The institution shall not offer more than two degree programs during the term of its provisional approval to operate degree programs.(B) Enrollment of students on student visas shall not exceed 25 percent of total enrollment in any provisionally approved degree program.(2) The institution shall submit an accreditation plan, approved by the bureau, for the institution to become fully accredited within five years of issuance of its provisional approval to operate degree programs. The plan shall include, at minimum, identification of an accreditation agency recognized by the United States Department of Education from which the institution plans to seek accreditation, and outline the process by which the institution will achieve accreditation candidacy or preaccreditation within two years, and full accreditation within five years, of issuance of its provisional approval to operate degree programs.(3) The institution shall submit to the bureau all additional documentation the bureau deems necessary to determine if the institution will become fully accredited within five years of issuance of its provisional approval to operate degree programs.(b) If an institution is granted a provisional approval to operate degree programs pursuant to subdivision (a), the following is required:(1) Students seeking to enroll in that institution shall be notified in writing by the institution, before the execution of the student’s enrollment agreement, that the institution’s approval to operate is contingent upon it being subsequently accredited.(2) Within the first four years of issuance of the provisional approval to operate degree programs, the bureau may empanel a visiting committee to review the institution’s accreditation plan and any related documents or materials as determined by the visiting committee, and make a recommendation to the bureau regarding the institution’s progress to achieving full accreditation.(3) The institution shall provide evidence of accreditation candidacy or pre-accreditation preaccreditation within two years of issuance of its provisional approval to operate degree programs, and evidence of accreditation within five years of issuance of its provisional approval to operate degree programs, with the scope of that accreditation covering the offering of at least one degree program.(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), an institution required to comply with this section that fails to do so by the dates provided, as required, or for which accreditation is removed or revoked by the accrediting agency, shall have its provisional approval to operate degree programs automatically terminated on the applicable date. The bureau shall issue an order terminating the institution’s degree programs. An institution that has its degree programs terminated shall not enroll new students in any of its degree programs and shall execute a teach-out plan for its enrolled students in those degree programs.(2) (A) This section does not prohibit an institution from voluntarily ceasing to pursue accreditation. An institution that voluntarily ceases to pursue accreditation shall immediately notify the bureau in writing of the institution’s intent to stop offering its degree programs and shall comply with all other applicable laws and regulations. Upon the bureau’s receipt of the notification, the institution’s approval to operate degree programs is deemed voluntarily surrendered.(B) An institution offering both degree and nondegree programs that has its provisional approval to operate degree programs terminated or that voluntarily ceases to pursue accreditation may continue to offer its nondegree programs, subject to all other laws and regulations.(C) An institution that is pursuing accreditation under this section shall not make a change in ownership, change in control, or change in business organization form pursuant to Sections 94893 and 94894 until the institution obtains full accreditation.(d) (1) The bureau shall, upon the timely submission of sufficient evidence that an unaccredited institution is making strong progress toward obtaining accreditation, or if warranted by the accrediting agency’s conditions for applying for accreditation related to student enrollment or graduation, grant an institution’s request for an extension of time, not to exceed a combined total of five years, to meet the requirements of this section.(2) Evidence submitted to the bureau pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, an amended accreditation plan adequately identifying why preaccreditation, accreditation candidacy, or accreditation outlined in the original plan submitted to the bureau was not achieved, active steps the institution is taking to comply with this section, and documentation from an accrediting agency demonstrating either the institution’s likely ability to meet the requirements of this section or the accrediting agency’s relevant conditions for an institution to apply for accreditation.(3) The bureau may establish policies and procedures to comply with the requirements in this subdivision. Establishment of these policies and procedures are exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(e) An institution issued a provisional approval to operate degree programs under this section is required to comply with all other laws and regulations.(f) The bureau shall adopt emergency regulations for purposes of implementing this section. The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code. These emergency regulations shall become law through the regular rulemaking process on or before September 29, 2015.(g) An institution with a provisionally approved degree program that is terminated by the bureau or surrendered by the institution shall not apply for a provisional approval to operate degree programs until two years after the date of the prior termination or surrender.SEC. 6. Section 94885.7 of the Education Code is amended to read:94885.7. (a) When an institution offering at least one degree program has ceased to be accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, the institution shall notify the bureau immediately, but no more than seven days after it ceases to be accredited. The institution’s approval to operate degree programs shall become provisional as of the date that the institution ceases to be accredited.(b) An institution that has had its approval to operate degree programs become provisional shall satisfy the following requirements in order to maintain its provisional approval to operate degree programs from the bureau:(1) The institution shall not seek bureau approval for additional degree programs until the institution regains accreditation.(2) Within six months of its approval to operate degree programs becoming provisional, the institution shall submit an accreditation plan, to be approved by the bureau, for the institution to become fully accredited within five years of the date of its provisional approval to operate degree programs. The plan shall include, at minimum, identification of an accreditation agency recognized by the United States Department of Education from which the institution plans to seek accreditation, and outline the process by which the institution will achieve accreditation candidacy or preaccreditation within two years, and full accreditation within five years, of its provisional approval to operate degree programs.(3) The institution shall submit to the bureau all additional documentation the bureau deems necessary to determine if the institution will become fully accredited within five years of its approval to operate degree programs being deemed provisional.(c) An institution that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (b) shall comply with both of the following:(1) Notify students seeking to enroll in the institution, in writing, before the execution of the student’s enrollment agreement, that the institution’s approval to operate a degree program is contingent upon the institution being subsequently accredited.(2) Within the first two years of the institution’s approval to operate degree programs being deemed provisional, a visiting committee, empaneled by the bureau pursuant to Section 94882, shall review the institution’s documentation of provisional approval and its accreditation plan, and make a recommendation to the bureau regarding the institution’s progress toward achieving full accreditation.(d) (1) The bureau shall, upon the timely submission of sufficient evidence that an unaccredited institution is making strong progress toward obtaining accreditation, grant an institution’s request for an extension of time, not to exceed five years in total, to meet the requirements of this section.(2) Evidence submitted to the bureau pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, an amended accreditation plan adequately identifying why preaccreditation, accreditation candidacy, or accreditation outlined in the original plan submitted to the bureau was not achieved, active steps the institution is taking to comply with this section, and documentation from an accrediting agency demonstrating the institution’s likely ability to meet the requirements of this section.(3) The bureau may establish policies and procedures to comply with the requirements of this subdivision. Establishment of these policies and procedures are exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(e) Any institution that fails to comply with the requirements of this section by the dates provided shall have its provisional approval to operate degree programs automatically terminated on the applicable date. The bureau shall issue an order terminating the institution’s provisional approval to operate degree programs. An institution with a terminated provisional approval to operate degree programs shall not enroll new students in any of its degree programs and shall execute a teach-out plan for its enrolled students.(f) (1) This section does not prohibit an institution from voluntarily ceasing to pursue accreditation. An institution that voluntarily ceases to pursue accreditation shall immediately notify the bureau in writing of the institution’s intent to stop offering its degree programs and shall comply with all other applicable laws and regulations. Upon the bureau’s receipt of the notification, the institution’s approval to operate degree programs is deemed voluntarily surrendered.(2) An institution offering both degree and nondegree programs that has its provisional approval to operate degree programs terminated or that voluntarily ceases to pursue accreditation may continue to offer its nondegree programs and is subject to all other laws and regulations.(3) An institution that is pursuing accreditation under this section shall not make a change in ownership, change in control, or change in business organization form pursuant to Sections 94893 and 94894 until the institution obtains full accreditation.SEC. 7. Section 94887 of the Education Code is amended to read:94887. (a) An approval to operate shall be granted only after an applicant has presented sufficient evidence to the bureau through site visits or other methods deemed appropriate by the bureau, that the applicant has satisfied the minimum operating standards. The bureau shall deny an application for an approval to operate if the application does not satisfy those standards. The(b) The bureau may deny an application for an approval to operate institutions from an institution that would be owned by, have persons in control of, or employ institution institutional managers that had knowledge either of the following:(1) Knowledge of, should have known, or knowingly participated in any conduct that was the cause for revocation or unmitigated discipline at another institution.(2) Previously owned, controlled, or managed an institution that closed without complying with legal requirements to provide refunds to impacted students or appropriately preserve and make available records.SEC. 8. Section 94890 of the Education Code is amended to read:94890. (a) (1) (A) The bureau shall grant an institution that is accredited an approval to operate by means of its accreditation.(B) A nondegree program not within the scope of accreditation shall not be included as an approved program by the bureau without the express written consent of the institution’s accrediting agency.(2) The bureau shall adopt by regulation the process and procedures whereby an institution that is accredited may apply for and obtain an approval by means of that accreditation. The bureau shall establish application processing goals and timelines to ensure that an institution that has submitted a complete application for approval to operate by means of its accreditation has that application promptly reviewed for compliance within 30 days of the bureau’s receipt of the application or within an appropriate timeline as determined by the bureau. The timelines shall ensure that an institution that has submitted a complete and compliant application receives approval within 30 days of the application being deemed compliant by the bureau, or within an appropriate timeline as determined by the bureau.(b) The term of an approval to operate pursuant to this section shall be coterminous with the term of accreditation. Upon renewal of the institution’s accreditation, the institution shall submit verification to the bureau, on a form provided by the bureau, that the institution’s accreditation has been renewed.(c) Institutions that are granted an approval to operate by means of the institution’s accreditation shall comply with all other applicable requirements in this chapter.SEC. 9. Section 94891 of the Education Code is amended to read:94891. (a) The bureau shall adopt by regulation the process and procedures whereby an institution may obtain a renewal of an approval to operate.(b) To be granted a renewal of an approval to operate, the institution shall demonstrate its continued compliance with the minimum operating standards.(c) (1) An institution that is denied renewal of an approval to operate may file an appeal in accordance with the procedures established by the bureau pursuant to Section 94888.(2) An institution that has filed an appeal of a denial of a renewal application may continue to operate during the appeal process, but shall disclose in a written statement, approved by the bureau, to all current and prospective students, that the institution’s application for renewal of approval to operate was denied by the bureau because the bureau determined the application did not satisfy the requirements to operate in California, that the institution is appealing the bureau’s decision, and that the loss of the appeal may result in the institution’s closure.(3) If the bureau determines that the continued operation of the institution during the appeal process poses a significant risk of harm to students, the bureau shall make an emergency decision pursuant to its authority provided in Section 94938.SEC. 10. Section 94894 of the Education Code is amended to read:94894. The following changes to an approval to operate are considered substantive changes and require prior authorization:(a) A change in educational objectives, including an addition of a new diploma or a degree educational program unrelated to the approved educational programs offered by the institution.(b) A change in ownership or person in control.(c) A change in control.(d) A change in business organization form.(e) A change of location.(f) A change of name.(g) A significant change in the method of instructional delivery.(h) An addition of a separate branch.(i) An increase or decrease of 25 percent or more in the number of clock hours or credit hours required for successful completion of the program.(j) Participation in federal student financial aid programs authorized by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.).(k) A change in the academic measurement of an educational program from clock hours to credit hours.(l) A change in the distance education learning management system.SEC. 11. Section 94897 of the Education Code is amended to read:94897. An institution shall not do any of the following:(a) Use, or allow the use of, any reproduction or facsimile of the Great Seal of the State of California on a diploma.(b) Promise or guarantee employment, or otherwise overstate the availability of jobs upon graduation.(c) Advertise concerning job availability, degree of skill, or length of time required to learn a trade or skill unless the information is accurate and not misleading.(d) Advertise, or indicate in promotional material, without including the fact that the educational programs are delivered by means of distance education if the educational programs are so delivered.(e) Advertise, or indicate in promotional material, that the institution is accredited, unless the institution has been accredited by an accrediting agency.(f) Solicit students for enrollment by causing an advertisement to be published in “help wanted” columns in a magazine, newspaper, or publication, or use “blind” advertising that fails to identify the institution.(g) Offer to compensate a student to act as an agent of the institution with regard to the solicitation, referral, or recruitment of any person for enrollment in the institution, except that an institution may award a token gift to a student for referring an individual, provided that the gift is not in the form of money, no more than one gift is provided annually to a student, and the gift’s cost is not more than one hundred dollars ($100).(h) Pay any consideration to a person to induce that person to sign an enrollment agreement for an educational program.(i) Use a name in any manner improperly implying any of the following:(1) The institution is affiliated with any government agency, public or private corporation, agency, or association if it is not, in fact, thus affiliated.(2) The institution is a public institution.(3) The institution grants degrees, if the institution does not grant degrees.(j) In any manner make an untrue or misleading change in, or untrue or misleading statement related to: a test score, grade or record of grades, attendance record, record indicating student completion, placement, employment, salaries, or financial information; a financial report filed with the bureau; information or records relating to the student’s eligibility for student financial aid at the institution; or any other record or document required by this chapter or by the bureau.(k) Willfully falsify, destroy, or conceal any document of record while that document of record is required to be maintained by this chapter.(l) Use the terms “approval,” “approved,” “approval to operate,” or “approved to operate” without stating clearly and conspicuously that approval to operate means compliance with state standards as set forth in this chapter. An institution may not state or imply either of the following:(1) The institution or its educational programs are endorsed or recommended by the state or by the bureau.(2) The approval to operate indicates that the institution exceeds minimum state standards as set forth in this chapter.(m) Direct any individual to do any of the following:(1) Perform an act that violates this chapter.(2) Refrain from reporting unlawful conduct to the bureau or another government agency.(3) Engage in any unfair act to persuade a student not to complain to the bureau or another government agency.(n) Compensate an employee involved in recruitment, enrollment, admissions, student attendance, or sales of educational materials to students on the basis of a commission, commission draw, bonus, quota, or other similar method related to the recruitment, enrollment, admissions, student attendance, or sales of educational materials to students, except as provided in paragraph (1) or (2):(1) If the educational program is scheduled to be completed in 90 days or less, the institution shall pay compensation related to a particular student only if that student completes the educational program.(2) For institutions participating in the federal student financial aid programs, this subdivision shall not prevent the payment of compensation to those involved in recruitment, admissions, or the award of financial aid if those payments are in conformity with federal regulations governing an institution’s participation in the federal student financial aid programs.(o) Require a prospective student to provide personal contact information in order to obtain, from the institution’s internet website, educational program information that is required to be contained in the school catalog or any information required pursuant to the consumer information requirements of Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, and any amendments thereto.(p) Offer an associate, baccalaureate, master’s, or doctoral degree without disclosing to prospective students before enrollment whether the institution or the degree program is unaccredited and any known limitation of the degree, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Whether a graduate of the degree program will be eligible to sit for the applicable licensure exam in California and other states.(2) A statement that reads: “A degree program that is unaccredited or a degree from an unaccredited institution is not recognized for some employment positions, including, but not limited to, positions with the State of California.”(3) That a student enrolled in an unaccredited institution is not eligible for federal financial aid programs.(q) In any manner commit fraud against, or make a material untrue or misleading statement to, a student or prospective student under the institution’s authority or the pretense or appearance of the institution’s authority.(r) Charge or collect any payment for institutional charges that are not authorized by an executed enrollment agreement.(s) Violate Section 1788.93 of the Civil Code or withhold any documentation required pursuant to Section 909 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations because the student owes a debt or as a tool for debt collection. for licensure, certification, or eligibility to sit for related examinations as a means of collecting a debt or because the student owes a debt.(t) Require a prospective, current, or former student or employee to sign a nondisclosure agreement pertaining to their relationship to, or experience with, the institution, except that an institution may use a nondisclosure agreement to protect the institution’s intellectual property and trade secrets. Any nondisclosure agreement in violation of this section is void and not enforceable at law or in equity.(u) Fail to maintain policies related to compliance with this chapter or adhere to the institution’s stated policies.SEC. 12. Section 94900.7 of the Education Code is repealed.SEC. 13. Section 94902 of the Education Code is amended to read:94902. (a) A student shall enroll solely by means of executing an enrollment agreement. The enrollment agreement shall be signed and dated by the student and by an authorized employee of the institution.(b) An enrollment agreement is not enforceable unless all of the following requirements are met:(1) The student has received the institution’s current catalog and School Performance Fact Sheet before signing the enrollment agreement.(2) At the time of the execution of the enrollment agreement, the institution held a valid approval to operate.(3) Before the execution of the enrollment agreement, the student and the institution have signed and dated the information required to be disclosed in the School Performance Fact Sheet pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 94910. Each of these items in the School Performance Fact Sheet shall include a line for the student to initial and shall be initialed and dated by the student.(c) A student shall receive a copy of the signed enrollment agreement, in writing or electronically, regardless of whether total charges are paid by the student.SEC. 14. Section 94909 of the Education Code is amended to read:94909. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), before enrollment, an institution shall provide a prospective student, either in writing or electronically, with a current school catalog containing, at minimum, all of the following:(1) The name, address, telephone number, and, if applicable, internet website address of the institution.(2) Except as specified in Article 2 (commencing with Section 94802), a statement that the institution is a private institution and that it is approved to operate by the bureau.(3) The following statements:(A) “Any questions a student may have regarding this catalog that have not been satisfactorily answered by the institution may be directed to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education at (address), Sacramento, CA (ZIP Code), (internet website address), (telephone and fax numbers).”(B) “As a prospective student, you are encouraged to review this catalog before signing an enrollment agreement. You are also encouraged to review the School Performance Fact Sheet, which must be provided to you before signing an enrollment agreement.”(C) “A student or any member of the public may file a complaint about this institution with the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education by calling (toll-free telephone number) or by completing a complaint form, which can be obtained on the bureau’s internet website (internet website address).”(D) “The Office of Student Assistance and Relief is available to support prospective students, current students, or past students of private postsecondary educational institutions in making informed decisions, understanding their rights, and navigating available services and relief options. The office may be reached by calling (toll-free telephone number) or by visiting (internet website address).”(4) The address or addresses where class sessions will be held.(5) A description of the programs offered and a description of the instruction provided in each of the courses offered by the institution, the requirements for completion of each program, including required courses, any final tests or examinations, any required internships or externships, and the total number of credit hours, clock hours, or other increments required for completion.(6) If the educational program is designed to lead to positions in a profession, occupation, trade, or career field requiring licensure in this state, a notice to that effect and a list of the requirements for eligibility for licensure.(7) Information regarding the faculty and their qualifications.(8) A detailed description of institutional policies in the following areas:(A) Admissions policies, including the institution’s policies regarding the acceptance of credits earned at other institutions or through challenge examinations and achievement tests, and a list describing any transfer or articulation agreements between the institution and any other college or university that provides for the transfer of credits earned in the program of instruction. If the institution has not entered into an articulation or transfer agreement with any other college or university, the institution shall disclose that fact.(B) Cancellation, withdrawal, and refund policies, including an explanation that the student has the right to cancel the enrollment agreement and obtain a refund of charges paid through attendance at the first class session, or the seventh day after enrollment, whichever is later. The text shall also include a description of the procedures that a student is required to follow to cancel the enrollment agreement or withdraw from the institution and obtain a refund consistent with the requirements of Article 13 (commencing with Section 94919).(C) Probation and dismissal policies.(D) Attendance policies.(E) Leave-of-absence policies.(9) The schedule of total charges for a period of attendance and an estimated schedule of total charges for the entire educational program.(10) A statement reporting whether the institution participates in federal and state financial aid programs, and if so, all consumer information that is required to be disclosed to the student pursuant to the applicable federal and state financial aid programs.(11) (A) A statement specifying that, if a student obtains a loan to pay for an educational program, the student will have the responsibility to repay the full amount of the loan plus interest, less the amount of any refund, refund owed and less any claims and defenses asserted pursuant to Section 94916, and that, if the student has received federal student financial aid funds, the student is entitled to a refund of the moneys not paid from federal student financial aid program funds.(B) A statement that the obligation to repay in subparagraph (A) does not apply if the loan becomes void and unenforceable pursuant to Section 94917 or other state law.(12) A statement specifying whether the institution has a pending petition in bankruptcy, is operating as a debtor in possession, has filed a petition within the preceding five years, or has had a petition in bankruptcy filed against it within the preceding five years that resulted in reorganization under Chapter 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. Sec. 1101 et seq.).(13) If the institution provides placement services, a description of the nature and extent of the placement services.(14) A description of the student’s rights and responsibilities with respect to the Student Tuition Recovery Fund. This statement shall specify that it is a state requirement that a student who pays the student’s tuition is required to pay a state-imposed assessment for the Student Tuition Recovery Fund. This statement shall also describe the purpose and operation of the Student Tuition Recovery Fund and the requirements for filing a claim against the Student Tuition Recovery Fund.(15) The following statement: “NOTICE CONCERNING TRANSFERABILITY OF CREDITS AND CREDENTIALS EARNED AT OUR INSTITUTIONThe transferability of credits you earn at (name of institution) is at the complete discretion of an institution to which you may seek to transfer. Acceptance of the (degree, diploma, or certificate) you earn in (name of educational program) is also at the complete discretion of the institution to which you may seek to transfer. If the (credits or degree, diploma, or certificate) that you earn at this institution are not accepted at the institution to which you seek to transfer, you may be required to repeat some or all of your coursework at that institution. For this reason you should make certain that your attendance at this institution will meet your educational goals. This may include contacting an institution to which you may seek to transfer after attending (name of institution) to determine if your (credits or degree, diploma, or certificate) will transfer.” (16) A statement specifying whether the institution, or any of its degree programs, are accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education. If the institution is unaccredited and offers an associate, baccalaureate, master’s, or doctoral degree, or is accredited and offers an unaccredited program for an associate, baccalaureate, master’s, or doctoral degree, the statement shall disclose the known limitations of the degree program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Whether a graduate of the degree program will be eligible to sit for the applicable licensure exam in California and other states or become certified or registered as required for the applicable profession, occupation, trade, or career field in California.(B) A degree program that is unaccredited or a degree from an unaccredited institution is not recognized for some employment positions, including, but not limited to, positions with the State of California.(C) That a student enrolled in an unaccredited institution is not eligible for federal financial aid programs.(b) If the institution has a general student brochure, handbook, or other student-facing materials that provide additional clarity about the information or policies required to be included in the catalog, the institution shall provide those materials to the prospective student before enrollment. In addition, if the institution has program-specific materials for the program in which the prospective student seeks to enroll, the institution shall provide the program-specific materials to the prospective student before enrollment.(c) An institution shall provide the school catalog to any person upon request. In addition, if the institution has student brochures, the institution shall disclose the requested brochures to any interested person upon request.(d) An accredited institution is not required to provide a School Performance Fact Sheet to a prospective student who is not a California resident, not residing in California at the time of the student’s enrollment, and enrolling in an accredited distance learning degree program offered by the institution, if the institution complies with all federal laws, the applicable laws of the state where the student is located, and other appropriate laws, including, but not limited to, consumer protection and student disclosure requirements.SEC. 15. Section 94911 of the Education Code is amended to read:94911. An enrollment agreement shall include, at minimum, all of the following:(a) The name of the institution and the name of the educational program, including the total number of credit hours, clock hours, or other increment required to complete the educational program, and a description of the method of delivery that will be used for instruction in the educational program.(b) A schedule of total charges, including a list of any charges that are nonrefundable and the student’s obligations to the Student Tuition Recovery Fund, clearly identified as nonrefundable charges.(c) In underlined capital letters on the same page of the enrollment agreement in which the student’s signature is required, “THE TOTAL CHARGES FOR THE CURRENT PERIOD OF ATTENDANCE,” “THE ESTIMATED TOTAL CHARGES FOR THE ENTIRE EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM,” and “THE TOTAL CHARGES THE STUDENT IS OBLIGATED TO PAY UPON ENROLLMENT,” followed by the relevant amounts of charges in bold, underlined type.(d) A clear and conspicuous statement that the enrollment agreement is legally binding when signed by the student and accepted by the institution.(e) (1) A disclosure with a clear and conspicuous caption, “STUDENT’S RIGHT TO CANCEL,” under which it is explained that the student has the right to cancel the enrollment agreement and obtain a refund of charges paid through attendance at the first class session, or the seventh day after enrollment, whichever is later.(2) The disclosure shall contain the institution’s refund policy and a statement that, if the student has received federal student financial aid funds, the student is entitled to a refund of moneys not paid from federal student financial aid program funds.(3) The text shall also include a description of the procedures that a student is required to follow to cancel the enrollment agreement or withdraw from the institution and obtain a refund.(4) The disclosure shall list the date of the first class session.(f) (1) A statement specifying that, if the student obtains a loan to pay for an educational program, the student will have the responsibility to repay the full amount of the loan plus interest, less the amount of any refund. refund and less any claims and defenses asserted pursuant to Section 94916.(2) A statement that the obligation to repay in paragraph (1) does not apply if the loan becomes void and unenforceable pursuant to Section 94917 or other state law.(g) A statement specifying that, if the student is eligible for a loan guaranteed by the federal or state government and the student defaults on the loan, both of the following may occur:(1) The federal or state government or a loan guarantee agency may take action against the student, including applying any income tax refund to which the person is entitled to reduce the balance owed on the loan.(2) The student may not be eligible for any other federal student financial aid at another institution or other government assistance until the loan is repaid.(h) The transferability disclosure that is required to be included in the school catalog, as specified in paragraph (15) of subdivision (a) of Section 94909.(i) The following statement: “Prior to signing this enrollment agreement, you must be given a copy of the institution’s current catalog, a brochure, or handbook, as applicable, and a School Performance Fact Sheet, which you are encouraged to review prior to signing this agreement. These documents contain important policies and performance data for this institution. This institution is required to have you sign and date the information included in the School Performance Fact Sheet relating to completion rates, placement rates, license examination passage rates, salaries or wages, and the most recent three-year cohort default rate, if applicable, prior to signing this agreement.”(j) The following statements: (1) “Any questions a student may have regarding this enrollment agreement that have not been satisfactorily answered by the institution may be directed to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education at (address), Sacramento, CA (ZIP Code), (internet website address), (telephone and fax numbers).” (2) “A student or any member of the public may file a complaint about this institution with the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education by calling (toll-free telephone number) or by completing a complaint form, which can be obtained on the bureau’s internet website (internet website address).” (k) The following statement above the space for the student’s signature and date: “I understand that this is a legally binding contract. By signing and dating this contract, I certify that I have read, understood, and agreed to my rights and responsibilities, and that the institution’s cancellation and refund policies have been clearly explained to me.” responsibilities.” SEC. 16. Section 94912.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:94912.5. (a) By January 1, 2020, and permanently thereafter, each institution subject to this chapter that participates in federal student financial aid programs, including, but not limited to, those programs authorized by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965 or veterans’ financial aid programs authorized pursuant to Section 21.4253 of Title 38 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall provide students with the College Financing Plan as developed by the United States Department of Education, or any successor document, to inform students or potential students about financial aid award packages before enrollment. A copy of this document shall be retained with other required student records.(b) In implementing this section, an institution that is subject to this chapter that participates in federal student financial aid programs, including, but not limited to, those programs authorized by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965 or veterans’ financial aid programs authorized pursuant to Section 21.4253 of Title 38 of the Code of Federal Regulations, may seek guidance as needed from the United States Department of Education.SEC. 17. Section 94913 of the Education Code is amended to read:94913. (a) An institution that maintains an internet website shall provide on that internet website the current version of all of the following:(1) The school catalog.(2) A School Performance Fact Sheet for each educational program offered by the institution.(3) Student brochures, handbooks, or other student-facing materials offered by the institution that provide additional clarity about the information or policies required to be included in the catalog.(4) A link to the bureau’s internet website.(5) The institution’s most recent annual report submitted to the bureau.(b) An institution shall include information concerning where students may access the bureau’s internet website anywhere the institution identifies itself as being approved by the bureau.SEC. 18. Section 94916 of the Education Code is amended to read:94916. (a) An institution directly or indirectly receiving proceeds from a credit contract or extending credit or lending money to an individual for institutional and noninstitutional charges for an educational program shall cause any note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness taken in connection with that extension of credit or loan to be conspicuously marked on its face in at least 12-point type with the following notice:“NOTICE”“NOTICE“YouYou may assert against the holder of the credit contract you signed in order to finance the cost of the educational program all of the claims and defenses that you could assert against this institution. Recovery under this provision may not exceed the amount you have already paid under the credit contract.”(b) It is a violation of this chapter for an institution to directly or indirectly receive proceeds from a credit contract that does not contain the notice described in subdivision (a).SEC. 19. Section 94917 of the Education Code is amended to read:94917. A note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness relating to payment for an educational program is void and not enforceable unless, at if either of the following applies:(a) At the time of execution of the note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness, the institution held did not hold an approval to operate or valid out-of-state registration with the bureau.(b) If the educational program is discontinued or canceled or if the institution closes before completion of the educational program.SEC. 20. Section 94918 of the Education Code is amended to read:94918. In making consumer loans to students, students directly, or in arrangements with third parties, an institution shall also comply with the requirements of the Federal Truth in Lending Act pursuant to Title 15 of the United States Code. Code and state consumer protection laws.SEC. 19.SEC. 21. Section 94923 of the Education Code is amended to read:94923. (a) The Student Tuition Recovery Fund relieves or mitigates economic loss suffered by a student in connection with enrollment in an institution not exempt from this article pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 94874), who, at the time of the student’s enrollment, was a California resident or was enrolled in a California residency program, prepaid tuition, and suffered economic loss.(b) (1) The bureau shall adopt, by regulation, procedures governing the administration and maintenance of the Student Tuition Recovery Fund. The fund shall be used to provide awards to students who suffer economic loss.(2) The following students, and any other students deemed appropriate, are eligible for payment from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund:(A) Any student who was enrolled at an institution, at a location of the institution, or in an educational program offered by the institution, at the time that institution, location, or program was closed or discontinued, as applicable, who did not choose to participate in a teach-out plan approved by the bureau or did not complete a chosen teach-out plan approved by the bureau.(B) Any student who was enrolled at an institution or a location of the institution within the 120-day period before the closure of the institution or location of the institution, or who was enrolled in an educational program within the 120-day period before the program was discontinued.(C) Any student who was enrolled at an institution or a location of the institution more than 120 days before the closure of the institution or location of the institution, in an educational program offered by the institution as to which the bureau determines there was a significant decline in the quality or value of the program more than 120 days before closure. In making this determination, the bureau may rely on findings by an oversight entity, as defined in Section 94934.5.(D) A student to whom an institution has been ordered to pay a refund by the bureau but has failed to do so, or a student to whom a government body, at any point, designates the student as eligible for relief under a program that addresses unlawful activity or closure, including, but not limited to, a refund, restoration of benefits, or loan discharge program such as federal “Closed School Discharge,” “False Certification,” or “Borrower Defense” programs.(E) A student to whom an institution has failed to pay or reimburse loan proceeds under a federal student loan program as required by law, or has failed to pay or reimburse proceeds received by the institution in excess of tuition and other costs.(F) A student who has been awarded restitution, a refund, or other relief, including, but not limited to, an enforcement action, a settlement agreement, debt relief determination, or monetary award by a governmental agency or an arbitrator or court, based on unlawful activity by an institution or representative of an institution, but who has been unable to collect the award from the institution or obtain debt cancellation. The bureau shall review the award or judgment and shall ensure the amount to be paid from the fund does not exceed the student’s economic loss.(G) Notwithstanding the definition of economic loss in subdivision (f), for purposes of recovery from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund, a student who has sought legal counsel that resulted in the cancellation of one or more student loans in connection with the student’s Student Tuition Recovery Fund claim may seek reimbursement for legal services rendered in an amount up to five hundred dollars ($500). The bureau shall review the invoice of the legal services rendered and evidence of the cancellation of the student loan or loans, and upon verifying that cancellation, pay the claim directly to the student.(3) Notwithstanding the requirement that a student attend an institution that is not exempt from this article as provided in subdivision (a), the following students who either were enrolled at a California campus of a Corinthian Colleges, Inc., institution or who were California students enrolled in an online program offered by an out-of-state campus of a Corinthian Colleges, Inc., institution are eligible for payment from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund:(A) A student who meets one of the eligibility requirements in paragraph (2), if the student also was residing in California and was attending a campus of a Corinthian Colleges, Inc., institution on or after January 1, 2010.(B) A student who was enrolled as of June 20, 2014, or withdrew within 120 days of that date, and did not complete the student’s program at the institution.(c) Any student who is required to pay a Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessment who pays tuition equal to or greater than the required assessment shall be deemed to have paid the required assessment, whether or not the student’s enrollment agreement specifies collection of the required assessment, and whether or not the institution identifies any money collected from the student as a Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessment.(d) A student who suffers educational opportunity losses, whose charges are paid by a third-party payer, is eligible for educational credits under the fund.(e) The bureau may seek repayment to the Student Tuition Recovery Fund from an institution found in violation of the law for which a student claim was paid. An institution shall not be eligible to renew its approval to operate with the bureau if the repayment is not made to the bureau as requested.(f) (1) For purposes of this section, “economic loss” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:(A) All cash or other consideration paid by the student to the institution.(B) All expenses related to private or government student loans, including retail installment contracts made by the institution, paid to the student or to the institution in connection with the student’s attendance at the institution, including related principal, interest, and any fees.(C) All third-party payments, including government grants, paid to the student or to the institution in connection with the student’s attendance at the institution.(2) Economic loss does not include Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessments, unless the student is entitled to a full refund under Section 94919 or 94920, or nonpecuniary damages such as inconvenience, aggravation, emotional distress, or punitive damages. Economic loss does not include legal fees, attorney fees, court costs, or arbitration fees. This subdivision shall not prevent the bureau from further defining economic loss to include loss of educational opportunity.(g) As a condition of the bureau satisfying a student loan obligation on behalf of a Student Tuition Recovery Fund applicant, the loan servicer or debtholder shall submit a letter stating that the servicer or holder will no longer collect on the debt and shall report the debt as “paid in full” to all credit reporting agencies. The bureau shall retain a copy of that letter and provide the original to the applicant.(h) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (i), the bureau shall require a student seeking reimbursement from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund to file a written application that shall be received by the bureau no later than four years after the date of the action that made the student eligible for recovery from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund.(2) In making a determination about student eligibility and economic loss, in addition to evidence submitted with an application, the bureau may consider all available evidence, including, but not limited to, evidence obtained in the bureau’s investigation and enforcement functions and evidence available to the bureau that is obtained in the course of oversight and enforcement actions by an accreditor, other government agency, or private adjudication. The bureau shall take into account the availability of records and may accept an attestation or other substantiation as deemed appropriate.(i) Any student whose loan is revived by a loanholder or debt collector after a period of noncollection by the holder or collector may, at any time, file a written application for recovery from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund for the debt that would have been otherwise eligible for recovery under this section.(j) The bureau may use the moneys in the Student Tuition Recovery Fund to cover the costs of both of the following:(1) Student Tuition Recovery Fund claim administration.(2) Positions of the Office of Student Assistance and Relief.SEC. 20.SEC. 22. Section 94925 of the Education Code is amended to read:94925. (a) In determining the amount of Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessments to collect from each student pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 94924, the bureau shall strive to maintain a fund balance in the Student Tuition Recovery Fund between fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) and twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), inclusive.(b) An otherwise eligible student who enrolled during a period when institutions were not required to collect Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessments is eligible for Student Tuition Recovery Fund payments despite not having paid any Student Tuition Recovery Fund assessment.SEC. 21.SEC. 23. Section 94927.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:94927.5. (a) Pursuant to regulations adopted by the bureau, an institution shall provide the bureau with the following:(1) Copies of pertinent student records, including transcripts, in electronic form, as determined by the bureau, pursuant to regulations adopted by the bureau.(2) If the institution is an accredited institution, a plan for the retention of records and transcripts, approved by the institution’s accrediting agency, that provides information as to how a student may obtain a transcript or any other information about the student’s coursework and degrees completed.(b) Subdivision (a) applies to all private postsecondary institutions, including institutions that are otherwise exempt from this chapter pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 94874).SEC. 24. Section 94934.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:94934.5. (a) An institution with an approval to operate that knows that it is being investigated by an oversight entity other than the bureau shall report that investigation, including the nature of that investigation, to the bureau in writing within 30 days of the institution’s first knowledge of the investigation. An(b) An institution with an approval to operate that is the subject of a judgment by, a regulatory action by, increased oversight or monitoring by, or a settlement with, any oversight entity other than the bureau shall report it to the bureau within 30 days. Failure to comply with this section may subject the institution to an administrative citation pursuant to Section 94936.(c) An institution with an approval to operate shall notify the bureau in writing within 30 days of filing for bankruptcy or becoming the subject of an involuntary bankruptcy petition. The written notice shall include all of the following:(1) The type of bankruptcy.(2) The court in which the petition was filed.(3) The case number.(4) The name and contact information of the bankruptcy trustee, if assigned.(5) A summary of the institution’s plan for continuing operation, student record retention, and student communication during the proceedings.(d) An institution shall report to the bureau within 30 days of the filing of an indictment or information charging a felony against the institution or an owner, person in control, or institutional manager, or within 30 days of the date the institution becomes aware of the filing, whichever is later. The report shall include the name of the individual, the arresting agency, charging documents, relevant orders, the date of the action, and a summary of the facts and circumstances underlying the allegation.(e) (1) An institution shall report to the bureau within 30 days of service of any civil action or arbitration brought by a current or former student, employee, or public official that alleges the institution’s failure to provide educational services, a violation of Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. 1681 et seq.) or a similar state law, a violation of this chapter, or a violation of any law concerning consumer protection, unfair business practices, or fraud.(2) The institution shall provide to the bureau, within 30 days of the institution’s first knowledge that the civil matter has been adjudicated or settled, a copy of the complaint filed by the plaintiff and a copy of the judgment, settlement agreement, or other document resolving the action or arbitration in which the institution is adjudicated liable for damages, restitution, or civil penalties in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or settles a claim for damages, restitution, or civil penalties in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).(3) The institution shall provide to the bureau a copy of the judgment, settlement agreement, or other document resolving the action or arbitration within 30 days after it is signed by the institution.(b)(f) For the purposes of this section, “investigation” means any an inquiry into possible violations of any applicable laws or accreditation standards.(c)(g) For the purposes of this section, “oversight entity” means all of the following:(1) Any A governmental agency.(2) Any An accrediting agency.(3) Any A professional licensing entity that exercises any programmatic or institutional approval over the institution.(4)Any private entity authorized pursuant to any provision of the Business and Professions Code to approve schools or educational programs for purposes of a professional certification.(4) A certification authority created under state or federal law.(h) Failure to comply with this section is considered a material violation, and an institution may be subject to citation, probation, suspension, or revocation of its approval to operate.SEC. 22.SEC. 25. Section 94941 of the Education Code is amended to read:94941. (a) An individual who has cause to believe that an institution has violated this chapter, or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, may file a complaint with the bureau against the institution. The complaint shall set forth the alleged violation, and shall contain any other information as may be required by the bureau.(b) To ensure that the bureau’s resources are maximized for the protection of the public, the bureau, in consultation with the advisory committee, shall establish priorities for its inspections and other investigative and enforcement resources to ensure that institutions representing the greatest threat of harm to the greatest number of students are identified and disciplined by the bureau or referred to the Attorney General.(c) In developing its priorities for inspection, investigation, and enforcement regarding institutions, the bureau shall consider as posing heightened risks the characteristics of the following institutions:(1) An institution that receives significant public resources, including an institution that receives more than 70 percent of its revenues from federal financial aid, state financial aid, financial aid for veterans, and other public student aid funds.(2) An institution with a large number of students defaulting on their federal loans, including an institution with a three-year cohort default rate above 15.5 percent.(3) An institution with reported placement rates, completion rates, or licensure rates in an educational program that are far higher or lower than comparable educational institutions or programs.(4) An institution that experiences a dramatic increase in enrollment, recently expanded educational programs or campuses, or recently consolidated campuses.(5) An institution that offers only nonremedial educational program courses in English, but enrolls students with limited or no English language proficiency.(6) An institution that has experienced a recent change of ownership or control, or a change in the business organization of the institution.(7) An institution with audited financial statements that do not satisfy the bureau’s requirements for financial stability.(8) An institution that has recently been the subject of an investigation, judgment, or regulatory action by, or a settlement with, a governmental agency.(9) An institution that experiences institutional or programmatic accreditation restriction by an accreditor, government restriction of, or injunction against, its approval to operate, or placement on cash-reimbursement or heightened monitoring status by the United States Department of Education.(d) The bureau shall, in consultation with the advisory committee, adopt regulations to establish categories of complaints or cases that are to be handled on a priority basis. The priority complaints or cases shall include, but not be limited to, those alleging unlawful, unfair unfair, or fraudulent business acts or practices, including unfair, deceptive, untrue, or misleading statements, including all statements made or required to be made pursuant to the requirements of this chapter, related to any of the following:(1) Degrees, educational programs, or internships offered, the appropriateness of available equipment for a program, or the qualifications or experience of instructors.(2) Job placement, graduation, time to complete an educational program, or educational program or graduation requirements.(3) Loan eligibility, terms, whether the loan is federal or private, or default or forbearance rates.(4) Passage rates on licensing or certification examinations or whether an institution’s degrees or educational programs provide students with the necessary qualifications to take these exams and qualify for professional licenses or certifications.(5) Cost of an educational program, including fees and other nontuition charges.(6) Affiliation with or endorsement by any government agency, or by any organization or agency related to the Armed Forces, including, but not limited to, groups representing veterans.(7) Terms of withdrawal and refunds from an institution.(8) Payment of bonuses, commissions, or other incentives offered by an institution to its employees or contractors.SEC. 23.SEC. 26. Section 94944 of the Education Code is amended to read:94944. Notwithstanding any other law, the bureau shall cite any person, and that person shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), for operating an institution or offering or providing to the public educational programs without proper approval to operate issued by the bureau pursuant to this chapter. The maximum fine for unlicensed activity is separate and not inclusive of fines for other violations or refunds ordered.SEC. 24.SEC. 27. Section 94944.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:94944.5. Each institution subject to this chapter shall be deemed to have authorized its accrediting agency, or any accrediting agency from which it is pursuing accreditation, to provide the bureau, the Attorney General, any district attorney, city attorney, or the Student Aid Commission, within 30 days of written notice, copies of all documents and other material concerning the institution that are maintained by the accrediting agency.SEC. 25.SEC. 28. Section 94944.6 of the Education Code is amended to read:94944.6. Within 30 days of receiving a written notice from the bureau, the Attorney General, district attorney, city attorney, or the Student Aid Commission pursuant to Section 94944.5, an accrediting agency shall provide the requesting entity with all documents or other material concerning an institution accredited by or in pursuit of accreditation by that agency that are designated specifically or by category in the written notice.SEC. 26.SEC. 29. Section 94948 of the Education Code is amended to read:94948. In addition to any other reporting requirements under this chapter, the director shall provide written updates to the Legislature annually and shall participate in all oversight hearings conducted by the appropriate policy committees and budget subcommittees of the Senate and Assembly. The updates shall describe the bureau’s progress in protecting consumers and enforcing the provisions of this chapter and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information received pursuant to Section 325 of the Business and Professions Code:(a) The total number of student complaints received.(b) The general nature of these complaints.(c) The outcome of these student complaints.SEC. 27.SEC. 30. Section 94950 of the Education Code is amended to read:94950. This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed. SEC. 28.SEC. 31. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.